District of Columbia statutes.
47-319.02

Composition.

(a)

The Committee shall consist of 9 members as follows:

(1)

City Administrator or his or her designee, provided that the designee shall have the full authority of the City Administrator;

(2)

Budget Director for the Council;

(3)

Inspector General (“IG”) or his or her designee, provided that the designee shall have the full authority of the IG;

(4)

Chief Financial Officer (“CFO”) or his or her designee, provided that the designee shall have the full authority of the CFO;

(5)

Director of the Office of Personnel (“Director”) or his or her designee, provided that the designee shall have the full authority of the Director;

(6)

Auditor or his or her designee, provided that the designee shall have the full authority of the Auditor;

(7)

Chief Information Officer;

(8)

One person designated by the Chairman of the Council Committee of the Whole; and

(9)

One person designated by the Chairman of the Council Committee on Government Operations.

(b)

The City Administrator shall serve as the chair of the Committee.

(c)

Four members of the Committee shall constitute a quorum.

Mar. 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 702, 43 DCR 5
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-319.01.
1981 Ed., § 47-319.2.